apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<pardef n="st/ick__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ick</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ick</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>icks</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uck</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uck</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>icking</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>icking</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>icking</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="str/ike__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ike</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ike</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ikes</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uck</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uck</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iking</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iking</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iking</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="sw/ell__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ells</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elled</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elled</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ollen</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="sw/im__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ims</l>
          <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imming</l>
          <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imming</l>
          <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imming</l>
          <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="t/each__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eachs</l>
          <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aught</l>
          <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aught</l>
          <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaching</l>
          <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaching</l>
          <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaching</l>
          <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>    
    
<pardef n="tr/ead__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ead</l>
          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ead</l>
          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eads</l>
          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>odden</l>
          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eading</l>
          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eading</l>
          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eading</l>
          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>      
    
<pardef n="underl/ie__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ay</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aid</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    

<e lm="teach"><i>t</i> <par n="t/each__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="swim"><i>sw</i> <par n="sw/im__vblex"/></e>
